Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 3. Conservation of Oil and Gas

§ 521.
Waste prohibited.

The waste of oil and gas is prohibited.

The Board shall limit the rate at which oil and gas may be produced from any field or reservoir to the most efficient rate consistent with economically feasible recovery as determined by the Board from available technical information. However, controlled well performance tests to determine maximum potential or maximum productivity may be performed periodically, when authorized by the Board.

The Board shall allocate the allowable production among the several wells or producing properties in a field or reservoir so that each owner will have a reasonable opportunity to produce or receive his or her just and equitable share of production. However, no allocation made by the Board shall be inconsistent with the prevention of waste.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 522.
Drilling units.

The Board shall regulate the spacing and location of oil and gas wells by the establishment of drilling units whenever reasonably necessary to prevent waste and protect correlative rights.

The Board may establish an exploratory unit whenever a well is to be drilled to test for the occurrence of a reservoir. The order establishing the exploratory drilling unit shall specify the size and shape of the exploratory unit.

To the extent that available geological and engineering information permit such a determination to be made, the exploratory unit shall be no smaller than the area expected to be drained by the exploratory well and shall be no larger than the expected total area of the reservoir.

If insufficient information is available, the Board may establish a temporary unit to ensure orderly development of the reservoir pending the availability of additional information.

The Board may establish the size and shape of development drilling units in known reservoirs based upon available geological and engineering data.

The size of a development drilling unit shall be the area that can be efficiently and economically drained by one well. If insufficient information is available to permit such a determination to be made, the Board may establish a temporary development unit pending the availability of the necessary information. In order that all owners are accorded substantially equal treatment, development units shall be of approximately uniform size if consistent with available geological and engineering information.

A well shall be located on a development drilling unit in accordance with a reasonably uniform field-wide spacing pattern, except for wells drilled or being drilled at the time a notice of hearing was issued. If the Board finds that a well drilled in a uniform spacing pattern would not be likely to produce in economic quantities, or that surface conditions would substantially add to the burden or hazard of drilling the well, or for other good cause, the well may be drilled at another location.

An order establishing development drilling units for a reservoir shall cover all lands believed to be underlain by that reservoir, and may be modified by the Board from time to time based on additional geological and engineering information. The Board may grant exceptions to the size and shape of any development unit or units, or may change the size or shape of any development unit or units, or may permit the drilling of additional wells if such actions are reasonably necessary to prevent waste or protect correlative rights.

After the date of the notice of hearing called to establish development units in a reservoir, unless expressly authorized by the Board, no well shall be commenced into that reservoir until an order establishing development drilling units has been adopted.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 523.
Pooling.

When two or more separately owned tracts are embraced within an exploratory or development drilling unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or part of a unit, the persons owning such tracts or interests may pool their tracts or interests. In the absence of voluntary pooling and upon application by any person owning a tract or interest within an exploratory or development drilling unit, the Board may enter an order pooling all tracts and interests within the unit.

All operations, including the commencement, drilling, operation, or production of a well upon any portion of a pooled unit shall be deemed for all purposes the commencement, drilling, operation, or production of a well upon each separately owned tract or upon each separately owned interest in the unit by the several owners. That portion of the production allocated to a separately owned tract or separately owned interest included in a unit shall be deemed to have been produced from such tract or interest.

Each pooling order of the Board shall specify which owner will drill, complete, and operate a well on the pooled unit. All owners shall share in the reasonable costs of drilling, completing, and operating the well. Any owner whose tract or interest has been involuntarily pooled shall be permitted, at his or her option, to pay his or her share of costs out of production, plus a supervision, risk, and interest assessment not to exceed 300 percent of that owner’s share of the costs.

Production and costs associated with a pooled unit shall be allocated among the owners in the same proportion each owner’s acreage in the unit bears to the total acreage in the unit or in any other manner agreed to by the owners and approved by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 524.
Antitrust immunity for voluntary units.

An agreement for the unit or cooperative development or operation of a field, reservoir, or part thereof, may be submitted to the Board for approval as being in the public interest or reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights.
For the purposes of this chapter, approval by the Board shall constitute a complete defense to any suit charging violation of any statute of the State relating to trust and monopolies on account of the agreement or on account of operations conducted pursuant to such agreement.
The failure to submit such an agreement to the Board for approval shall not for that reason imply or constitute evidence that the agreement or operations conducted pursuant thereto are in violation of laws relating to trusts and monopolies.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 525.
Field-wide unitization.

In addition to the authority for the establishment of drilling units for individual wells granted in section 522 of this title, the Board may establish field-wide units composed of one or more reservoirs or parts thereof and including one or more wells. After adequate geological, engineering, and other information has been required through development of the reservoir, the Board, on its own motion or upon application of any owner, shall hold a hearing to consider the need for cooperative development or operation as a field-wide unit.

The Board shall enter an order providing for the unit development or operation of a reservoir or part thereof if it finds that:

such operation will increase the ultimate recovery of oil or gas; and

the value of the estimated additional recovery of oil and gas exceeds the estimated additional cost incident to conducting such operations; and

the development or operation is reasonably necessary to prevent waste.

The order shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable and shall prescribe a plan for unit operations that shall include:

a description of the reservoir, reservoirs, or parts thereof to be operated as a unit, termed the unitized area;

a statement of the nature of the operations contemplated;

an allocation of production and costs to the separately owned tracts in the unitized area. The allocation shall be in accord with the agreement, if any, of the interested parties. If there is no such agreement, production shall be allocated in a manner calculated to ensure that each owner within the unitized area receives his or her just and equitable share of production. Costs shall be allocated on a just and reasonable basis;

a provision, if necessary, permitting any owner who has involuntarily unitized to pay his or her share of costs out of his or her share of production, plus a supervision, risk, and interest assessment not to exceed 300 percent of that owner’s share of the costs;

a provision for the supervision and conduct of the unit operations, in respect to which each owner shall have a vote with a value corresponding to the percentage of the costs of unit operations chargeable against its interest;

the time when the unit operations shall commence and the manner in which, and the circumstances under which, the unit operations shall terminate; and

such additional provisions as are found to be appropriate for carrying out the unit operations.

No order of the Board providing for unit operations shall become effective until the plan for unit operations approved by the Board:

has been approved in writing by the owners who, under the Board’s order, will be required to pay at least 60 percent of the costs of the unit operation, and also by those persons who own at least 60 percent of the royalties; and

the Board has made a finding, either in the order providing for unit operations or in a supplemental order, that the plan for unit operations has been approved.

If the plan for unit operations has not been approved at the time the order providing for unit operations is made, the Board shall upon application and notice hold supplemental hearings to determine if and when the plan for unit operations has been approved. If the persons owning required percentages of interest in the unitized area do not approve the plan for unit operations within a period of six months from the date on which the order providing for unit operations is made, or within such additional period or periods of time as the Board prescribes, the order will be unenforceable and shall be withdrawn by the Board.

An order providing for unit operations may be amended by Board order made in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an original order providing for unit operations, provided:

if the amendment affects only the rights and interests of the owners, the approval of the amendment by the owners of interests free of cost shall not be required; and

the order of amendment shall not change the percentage established in the original order for the allocation of oil and gas as established for any separately owned tract, except with the consent of all persons owning oil and gas rights in the tract; and

the order of amendment shall not change the percentage established in the original order for the allocation of cost as established for any separately owned tract, except with the consent of all owners in the tract.

The Board may order the unit operation of a reservoir or parts thereof that include a unitized area established by a previous order of the Board. In providing for the allocation of unit production, the order shall first treat the unitized area previously established as a single tract. The portion of the new unit production shall then be allocated among the separately owned tracts included in such previously established unit area in the same proportions as those specified in the previous order.

All operations, including the commencement, drilling, or operation of a well under any portion of the unit area shall be deemed for all purposes the conduct of that operation upon each separately owned tract in the unit area by the several owners. The portion of the unit production allocated to a separately owned tract in a unit area shall be deemed, for all purposes, to have actually been produced from the tract by a well drilled on it. Operations conducted pursuant to an order of the Board providing for unit operations shall constitute fulfillment of all the express or implied obligations of each lease or contract covering lands in the unit area to the extent that compliance with those obligations cannot be had because of the order of the Board.

The portion of the unit production allocated to any tract, and the proceeds from its sale, shall be the property and income of the several persons to whom, or to whose credit, they are allocated or payable under the order providing for unit operations.

No division order or other contract relating to the sale or purchase of production from a separately owned tract shall be terminated by the order providing for unit operations, but shall remain in force and apply to oil and gas allocated to that tract until terminated in accordance with the provisions of the order.

Except to the extent that the parties affected so agree, no order providing for unit operations shall be construed to result in a transfer of all or any part of the title of any person to the oil and gas rights in any tract in the unit area. All property, whether real or personal, that may be acquired in the conduct of unit operations shall be acquired for the account of the owners within the unit area, and shall be the property of those owners in the proportion that the expenses of unit operations are charged.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 526.
Ratable takes required.

Oil or gas produced in this State shall be purchased and taken without discrimination between producers in the same reservoir. After notice and hearing, the Board may relieve any person of his or her duty to purchase and take oil or gas produced in this State without discrimination, if the oil and gas is of inferior quality or for other good cause.

The provisions of this section do not apply:

to any wells or reservoirs used for storage and withdrawal from storage of oil or gas originally produced in compliance with this chapter and the rules of the Board;

to purchases of gas produced from oil wells; or

to any other purchases or production to which the Board finds, after notice and hearing, the application of this section would be unjust or unreasonable.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.